Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin NEWPORT; WATER AND SEWER INFRASTRUCTURE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $5,800,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the city of Newport to acquire right-of-way for and to predesign, design, and construct the removal, replacement, and installation of water, sanitary sewer, and storm sewer system infrastructure and reconstruction of affected streets in the project area to address inflow and infiltration. For purposes of this section, "project area" means 3rd Avenue between 21st Street and 15th Street, 17th Street between 3rd Avenue and the Mississippi River, 12th Street between 7th Avenue and the Mississippi River, 3rd Avenue between 14th Street and 12th Street, 13th Street between 7th Avenue and 4th Avenue, and 5th Avenue between 14th Street and 12th Street in the city of Newport. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $5,800,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end